New Jersey, session 222, S4484.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 2 of P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-302) is amended to read as follows: 2.    The Legislature finds that: a.     The New Jersey Supreme Court, through its rulings in Southern Burlington County NAACP v. Mount Laurel, 67 N.J. 151 (1975) and Southern Burlington County NAACP v. Mount Laurel, 92 N.J. 158 (1983), has determined that every municipality in a growth area has a constitutional obligation to provide through its land use regulations a realistic opportunity for a fair share of its region's present and prospective needs for housing for low- and moderate-income families. b.    In the second Mount Laurel ruling, the Supreme Court stated that the determination of the methods for satisfying this constitutional obligation "is better left to the Legislature," that the court has "always preferred legislative to judicial action in their field," and that the judicial role in upholding the Mount Laurel doctrine "could decrease as a result of legislative and executive action." c.     The interest of all citizens, including low- and moderate-income families in need of affordable housing, and the needs of the workforce, would be best served by a comprehensive planning and implementation response to this constitutional obligation. d.    There are a number of essential ingredients to a comprehensive planning and implementation response, including the establishment of reasonable fair share housing guidelines and standards, the initial determination of fair share by officials at the municipal level and the preparation of a municipal housing element, State review of the local fair share study and housing element, and continuous State funding for low- and moderate-income housing to replace the federal housing subsidy programs which have been almost completely eliminated. e.     The State can maximize the number of low- and moderate-income units provided in New Jersey by allowing its municipalities to adopt appropriate phasing schedules for meeting their fair share, so long as the municipalities permit a timely achievement of an appropriate fair share of the regional need for low- and moderate-income housing as required by the Mount Laurel I and II opinions and other relevant court decisions. f.     The State can also maximize the number of low- and moderate-income units by creating new affordable housing and by rehabilitating existing, but substandard, housing in the State.  Because the Legislature has determined, pursuant to P.L.2008, c.46 (C.52:27D-329.1 et al.), that it is no longer appropriate or in harmony with the Mount Laurel doctrine to permit the transfer of the fair share obligations among municipalities within a housing region, it is necessary and appropriate to create a new program to create new affordable housing and to foster the rehabilitation of existing, but substandard, housing. g.    Since the urban areas are vitally important to the State, construction, conversion, and rehabilitation of housing in our urban centers should be encouraged.  However, the provision of housing in urban areas must be balanced with the need to provide housing throughout the State for the free mobility of citizens. h.    The Supreme Court of New Jersey in its Mount Laurel decisions demands that municipal land use regulations affirmatively afford a  realistic opportunity for a variety and choice of housing including low- and moderate-cost housing, to meet the needs of people desiring to live there.  While provision for the actual construction of that housing by municipalities is not required, they are encouraged but not mandated to expend their own resources to help provide low- and moderate-income housing. i.     (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2024, c.2) j.     The Legislature finds that the use of regional contribution agreements, which permits municipalities to transfer a certain portion of their fair share housing obligation outside of the municipal borders, should no longer be utilized as a mechanism for the creation of affordable housing. k.    The Legislature finds that the role of the Council on Affordable Housing, as intended in the original enactment of the "Fair Housing Act," has not developed in practice as was intended in the legislation. l.     The council's inability to function ultimately led the Supreme Court in 2015 to order the temporary dissolution of the requirement that administrative remedies be exhausted prior to resolving affordable housing disputes before the court and allowed the courts to resume their role as the forum of first resort for evaluating municipal compliance with Mount Laurel obligations pursuant to guidelines laid out by the Supreme Court's order. m.   The Legislature finds that the council's inability to function led to a "gap period" that frustrated the intent of the Legislature and compliance with constitutional and statutory obligations and that it is necessary to establish definitive deadlines for municipal action and any challenges to those actions to avoid such a "gap period" from being repeated in the future. n.    The Legislature finds that although the court-led system that has developed since 2015 has resulted in a significant number of settlement agreements and increased production of affordable housing, the system could operate more expeditiously to produce affordable housing, and at a lower cost to all parties, if appropriate standards are established by the Legislature to be applied throughout the State, including more clarity on calculation on fair share affordable housing obligations using transparent and established data sources to eliminate the lengthy and costly processes of determining those obligations that have characterized both the Council on Affordable Housing and court-led system. o.    The Legislature determines that, considering the unique history of the "Fair Housing Act," the Council on Affordable Housing shall be abolished and that, pursuant to the formulas and process established pursuant to sections 6 and 7 of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.2 and C.52:27D-304.3), a municipality shall be authorized to seek approval of its fair share affordable housing obligation, adopted pursuant to binding resolution and then filed with the court, with the guidance of calculations published by the Department of Community Affairs, but that advocates for the low- and moderate-income households of the State shall be provided with an opportunity to contest the municipal determination. p.    The Legislature declares that the "Fair Housing Act," P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.), as amended and supplemented by P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.1 et al.), is intended to implement the Mount Laurel doctrine, and that municipalities in compliance with the "Fair Housing Act," P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.) are also in compliance with the Mount Laurel doctrine. q.    The Legislature finds that the population of persons aged 65 years and older in the State has grown from approximately 13 percent in 1990, to 17 percent in 2021, and that such growth, in conjunction with expected future growth, makes it appropriate for the Legislature to allow up to 30 percent of the units towards a municipality's prospective affordable housing obligation to be satisfied through the creation of age-restricted housing. r.  The "Fair Housing Act," P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.) and the "State Planning Act," P.L.1985, c.398 (C.52:18A-196 et al.) were enacted concurrently to address the ruling of the New Jersey Supreme Court in Southern Burlington County NAACP v. Mount Laurel, 92 N.J. 158 (1983) and associated land use planning concerns. s.     The Legislature, in amending and supplementing the "Fair Housing Act," P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.), intends to facilitate comprehensive planning in alignment with smart growth principles and the State Development and Redevelopment Plan. t.     The Legislature declares that the changes made to affordable housing methodologies, obligations, and fair share plans, as determined to be a necessity by the Legislature, through the enactment of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.1 et al.), are made with the intention of furthering consistency with the State Development and Redevelopment Plan. u.    The Legislature finds manufactured homes have lower building costs, are able to be constructed year-round, and that the design and durability of manufactured homes provide an affordable alternative to conventional homes, making it appropriate for the Legislature to allow municipalities to count the number of new manufactured homes located, or planned for location, in a municipality towards the municipalitys affordable housing obligation regardless of whether or not a manufactured home includes a deed restriction or other control on affordability. (cf: P.L.2024, c.2, s.1) 2.    Section 4 of P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-304) is amended to read as follows: 4.    As used in P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.): a.     "Council" means the Council on Affordable Housing established in P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.), abolished pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.1). b.    "Housing region" means a geographic area established pursuant to subsection b. of section 6 of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.2). c.     "Low-income housing" means housing affordable according to federal Department of Housing and Urban Development or other recognized standards for home ownership and rental costs and occupied or reserved for occupancy by households with a gross household income equal to 50 percent or less of the median gross household income for households of the same size within the housing region in which the housing is located. d.    "Moderate-income housing" means housing affordable according to federal Department of Housing and Urban Development or other recognized standards for home ownership and rental costs and occupied or reserved for occupancy by households with a gross household income equal to more than 50 percent but less than 80 percent of the median gross household income for households of the same size within the housing region in which the housing is located. e.     (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2024, c.2) f.     "Inclusionary development" means a residential housing development in which a substantial percentage of the housing units are provided for a reasonable income range of low- and moderate-income households. g.    "Conversion" means the conversion of existing commercial, industrial, or residential structures for low- and moderate-income housing purposes where a substantial percentage of the housing units are provided for a reasonable income range of low- and moderate-income households. h.    "Development" means any development for which permission may be required pursuant to the "Municipal Land Use Law," P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-1 et seq.). i.     "Agency" means the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency established by P.L.1983, c.530 (C.55:14K-1 et seq.). j.     "Prospective need" means a projection of housing needs based on development and growth which is reasonably likely to occur in a region or a municipality, as the case may be, as a result of actual determination of public and private entities.  Prospective need shall be determined by the methodology set forth pursuant to sections 6 and 7 of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.2 and C.52:27D-304.3) for the fourth round and all future rounds of housing obligations. k.    "Person with a disability" means a person with a physical disability, infirmity, malformation, or disfigurement which is caused by bodily injury, birth defect, aging, or illness including epilepsy and other seizure disorders, and which shall include, but not be limited to, any degree of paralysis, amputation, lack of physical coordination, blindness or visual impairment, deafness or hearing impairment, the inability to speak or a speech impairment, or physical reliance on a service animal, wheelchair, or other remedial appliance or device. l.     "Adaptable" means constructed in compliance with the technical design standards of the barrier free subcode adopted by the Commissioner of Community Affairs pursuant to the "State Uniform Construction Code Act," P.L.1975, c.217 (C.52:27D-119 et seq.) and in accordance with the provisions of section 5 of P.L.2005, c.350 (C.52:27D-123.15). m.   "Very low-income housing" means housing affordable according to federal Department of Housing and Urban Development or other recognized standards for home ownership and rental costs and occupied or reserved for occupancy by households with a gross household income equal to 30 percent or less of the median gross household income for households of the same size within the housing region in which the housing is located. n.    "Accessory dwelling unit" means a residential dwelling unit that provides complete independent living facilities with a private entrance for one or more persons, consisting of provisions for living, sleeping, eating, sanitation, and cooking, including a stove and refrigerator, and is located within a proposed or existing primary dwelling, within an existing or proposed structure that is accessory to a dwelling on the same lot, constructed in whole or part as an extension to a proposed or existing primary dwelling, or constructed as a separate detached structure on the same lot as the existing or proposed primary dwelling. o.    "Builder's remedy" means court-imposed, site-specific relief for a litigant who seeks to build affordable housing for which the court requires a municipality to utilize zoning techniques, such as mandatory set-asides or density bonuses, including techniques which provide for the economic viability of a residential development by including housing that is not for low- and moderate-income households. p.    "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Community Affairs. q.    "Compliance certification" means the certification obtained by a municipality pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.1), that protects the municipality from exclusionary zoning litigation during the current round of present and prospective need and through July 1 of the year the next round begins, which is also known as a "judgment of compliance" or "judgment of repose."  The term "compliance certification" shall include a judgment of repose granted in an action filed pursuant to section 13 of P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-313). r.     "County-level housing judge" means a judge appointed pursuant to section 5 of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-313.2), to resolve disputes over the compliance of municipal fair share affordable housing obligations and municipal fair share plans and housing elements, with the "Fair Housing Act," P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.). s.     "Deficient housing unit" means housing that: (1) is over fifty years old and overcrowded; (2) lacks complete plumbing; or (3) lacks complete kitchen facilities. t.     "Department" means the Department of Community Affairs. u.    "Exclusionary zoning litigation" means litigation to challenge the fair share plan, housing element, or ordinances or resolutions implementing the fair share plan or housing element of a municipality based on alleged noncompliance with the "Fair Housing Act," P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.) or the Mount Laurel doctrine, which litigation shall include, but shall not be limited to, litigation seeking a builder's remedy. v.    "Fair share plan" means the plan or proposal that is in a form which may readily be adopted, with accompanying ordinances and resolutions, pursuant to subsection f. of section 3 of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.1), by which a municipality proposes to satisfy its obligation to create a realistic opportunity to meet its fair share of low- and moderate-income housing needs of its region and which details the affirmative measures the municipality proposes to undertake to achieve its fair share of low- and moderate-income housing, as provided in the municipal housing element, and addresses the development regulations necessary to implement the housing element, including, but not limited to, inclusionary requirements and development fees, and the elimination of unnecessary housing cost-generating features from the municipal land use ordinances and regulations. w.   "Highlands-conforming municipality" means a municipality that has adopted a land development ordinance implementing the municipality's plan conformance petition and which land development ordinance has been certified by the Highlands Water Protection and Planning Council as consistent with the "Highlands Water Protection and Planning Act," P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-1 et seq.), the Highlands regional master plan, and the municipality's plan conformance approval.  The term "land development ordinance" shall be inclusive of any amendment to the municipality's land development ordinances that is adopted to further the municipality's petition of plan conformance. x.    "Housing element" means that portion of a municipality's master plan consisting of reports, statements, proposals, maps, diagrams, and text designed to meet the municipality's fair share of its region's present and prospective housing needs, particularly with regard to low- and moderate-income housing, and which shall contain the municipal present and prospective obligation for affordable housing, determined pursuant to subsection f. of section 3 of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-304.1). y.    "Program" means the Affordable Housing Dispute Resolution Program, established pursuant to section 5 of P.L.2024, c.2 (C.52:27D-313.2). z.     "State Development and Redevelopment Plan" or "State Plan" means the plan prepared pursuant to sections 1 through 12 of the "State Planning Act," P.L.1985, c.398 (C.52:18A-196 et al.), designed to represent a balance of development and conservation objectives best suited to meet the needs of the State, and for the purpose of coordinating planning activities and establishing Statewide planning objectives in the areas of land use, housing, economic development, transportation, natural resource conservation, agriculture and farmland retention, recreation, urban and suburban redevelopment, historic preservation, public facilities and services, and intergovernmental coordination pursuant to subsection f. of section 5 of P.L.1985, c.398 (C.52:18A-200). aa.   "Transitional housing" means temporary housing that: includes, but is not limited to, single-room occupancy housing or shared living and supportive living arrangements; provides access to on-site or off-site supportive services for very low-income households who have recently been homeless or lack stable housing; is licensed by the department; and allows households to remain for a minimum of six months. bb.  "Manufactured home" means a unit of housing that: (1) Consists of one or more transportable sections which are substantially constructed off site and, if more than one section, are joined together on site; (2)   Is built on a permanent chassis; (3)   Is designed to be used, when connected to utilities, as a dwelling on a permanent or nonpermanent foundation;  and (4)   Is manufactured in accordance with the standards promulgated for a manufactured home by the secretary pursuant to the "National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974,"  Pub.L. 93-383 (42 U.S.C. s. 5401 et seq.) and the standards promulgated for a manufactured or mobile home by the commissioner pursuant to the  "State Uniform Construction Code Act," P.L.1975, c. 217 (C. 52:27D-119 et seq.)."Manufactured home" also means and includes any unit of housing manufactured before the effective date of the standards promulgated by the Secretary of the United States Department of  Housing and Urban Development or by the commissioner, but which otherwise meets the criteria set forth in this subsection. (cf: P.L.2024, c.2, s.2) 3.    (New section) In the fourth round, and in subsequent rounds of affordable housing obligations, a municipality may provide for its affordable housing obligation by counting the number of new manufactured homes located, or planned for location, within the municipality.  A municipality shall be provided with one unit of credit against its affordable housing obligation for each new manufactured homes located, or planned for location, within the municipality regardless of whether or not the manufactured home includes a deed restriction or other control on affordability. 4.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to new manufactured homes in the process of building or planned for location as of this effective date.